Utah statutes.
59-10-1002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b) or Subsection 59-10-1003(2), "claimant" means a resident or nonresident person that has state taxable income.

(b)  "Claimant" does not include an estate or trust.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection 59-10-1003(2), "estate" means a nonresident estate or a resident estate that has state taxable income.

(3)  "Nonrefundable tax credit" or "tax credit" means a tax credit that a claimant, estate, or trust may:

(a)  claim:

(i)  as provided by statute; and

(ii)  in an amount that does not exceed the claimant's, estate's, or trust's tax liability under this chapter for a taxable year; and

(b)  carry forward or carry back:

(i)  if allowed by statute; and

(ii)  to the extent that the amount of the tax credit exceeds the claimant's, estate's, or trust's tax liability under this chapter for a taxable year.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection 59-10-1003(2), "trust" means a nonresident trust or a resident trust that has state taxable income.

